Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.494

Agency record in brief proceedings.

(1) The agency record consists of any documents regarding the matter that were considered or prepared by the presiding officer for the brief adjudicative proceeding or by the reviewing officer for any review. The agency shall maintain these documents as its official record.

(2) Unless otherwise required by a provision of law, the agency record need not constitute the exclusive basis for agency action in brief adjudicative proceedings or for the judicial review of brief adjudicative proceedings.

[ 1988 c 288 s 429.]